Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 3 HIGHER EDUCATION FUNDING
23-18-307. Budget provisions - reporting - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1319), ch. 169, p. 609, § 1, effective May 9.

L. 2020:

IP(3) amended and (5) added, (HB 20-1366), ch. 181, p. 833, § 8, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2021. (See L. 2020, p. 833.)

23-18-308. Fee-for-service contracts - limited purpose - repeal.

Subject to available appropriations, the department shall enter into fee-for-service contracts for the following purposes:

The creation of career pathways for students pursuant to sections 23-60-109 and 24-46.3-104;

Repealed.

Cybersecurity and distributed ledger technologies, such as blockchains, as set forth in sections 24-33.5-1904 and 24-33.5-1905;

Repealed.

The food systems advisory council pursuant to part 11 of article 31 of this title 23;

Providing services to maximize concurrent enrollment across the community college system as provided in section 23-60-202.7;

Repealed.

The conduct of feasibility studies and pilot deployments to investigate emerging technologies for water management pursuant to section 23-20-141.

This subsection (1)(h) is repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

The educator well-being and mental health program pursuant to section 23-20-142.

This subsection (1)(i) is repealed, effective July 1, 2026.

The Colorado rural health-care workforce initiative established in article 76.5 of this title 23, including for health-care professionals rural tracks at institutions of higher education and administrative costs and educational support provided by the university of Colorado's school of medicine's rural program.

Notwithstanding any provision of this part 3 to the contrary, the amount of a fee-for-service contract entered into pursuant to this section is not included in the calculation of "total state appropriation" or "total governing board appropriation" made pursuant to this part 3.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (HB 15-1274), ch. 196, p. 665, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

Entire section R&RE, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 765, § 44, effective June 6; entire section amended, (SB 16-196), ch. 226, p. 865, § 3, effective June 6.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (SB 18-086), ch. 319, p. 1919, § 7, effective May 30.

L. 2019:

(1)(b) and (1)(c) amended and (1)(d) added, (HB 19-1294), ch. 318, p. 2963, § 3, effective May 28; (1)(b) and (1)(c) amended and (1)(e) added, (HB 19-1202), ch. 403, p. 3573, § 4, effective May 31; (1)(b) and (1)(c) amended and (1)(g) added, (HB 19-1264), ch. 420, p. 3680, § 10, effective June 30; (1)(b) and (1)(c) amended and (1)(f) added, (SB 19-176), ch. 244, p. 2389, § 10, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(1)(h) added, (HB 21-1268), ch. 258, p. 1518, § 5, effective June 18; (1)(i) added, (SB 21-185), ch. 246, p. 1340, § 25, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(1)(j) added, (SB 22-172), ch. 298, p. 2135, § 3, effective June 1; (1)(b) repealed, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2975, § 49, effective August 10.